Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 1.2 State Crime Laboratory

12-1.2-1.
Creation.

There shall be a state crime laboratory located at the University of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. VIII, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.1-1

; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.2-1

.

12-1.2-2.
Jurisdiction.

The state crime laboratory shall have the authority to investigate any and all evidence relating to state or local crimes when requested by appropriate agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. VIII, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.1-3

; P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. § 12-1.2-11; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.2-2

.

12-1.2-3.
Functions of the state crime laboratory.

The state crime laboratory shall be responsible for:

Technical services.

To examine and evaluate physical evidence collected at the scene of a crime or related to a crime. The examinations will be conducted in areas such as forensic serology, firearms, analyses of accelerants, explosives, scientific methodology in microscopy, including fiber, hair, blood, and plant microscopy, spectroscopy, ion emission, glass examination, tool impressions, fingerprint techniques, tire impressions, and other similar technology;

To examine evidence upon submission by state and local fire departments and law enforcement agencies;

To assure the safe custody of that evidence;

To submit written reports of the results of examinations of evidence to the agency;

To request the services of qualified consultants when deemed necessary;

To render expert court testimony when requested;

To assist in the processing of a crime scene upon request to the director. Transportation as needed for this function should be provided by the agency requesting assistance.

Training.

To offer a training course in scientific criminal investigation each year to all enforcement divisions both state and local;

To offer refresher or in-service courses in specialty areas of scientific criminal investigation;

To conduct training dealing with police science, when requested, for each of the Rhode Island State Municipal Police Training Academy classes, the Providence Police Academy classes, and the Rhode Island State Police Academy classes.

Research. To conduct ongoing research in areas of the forensic sciences.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. VIII, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.1-2

; P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. § 12-1.2-10; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.2-3

.

12-1.2-4.
Funding.

The state crime laboratory shall be funded through the budget of the University of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 120, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 5, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 1.

12-1.2-5.
Director of state crime laboratory — Term.

The crime laboratory shall be under the immediate supervision of a director, who shall be known as the “director — state crime laboratory” and who shall possess a Ph.D. degree or an equivalent combination of a M.S. degree and experience in an appropriate field and who has had forensic training or experience.

The director shall serve for a period of five (5) years and may be reappointed by the commission thereafter to subsequent five (5) year terms.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. § 12-1.2-9; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.2-5

; P.L. 1994, ch. 50, § 2.

12-1.2-6.
Candidates for director and other positions — Selection — Appointment — Dismissals.

Candidates for the position of director and all other positions of the crime laboratory may be recommended to the commission by the executive secretary and/or other members of the commission as well as from all other sources.

The director and all other positions of the state crime laboratory shall be considered employees of the council on postsecondary education and shall be subject to all employment policies, practices, and procedures of the council on postsecondary education and the University of Rhode Island.

The appointive authority for the University of Rhode Island shall also be the appointing authority for the position of director and all other positions of the state crime laboratory subject to approval or disapproval by the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. § 12-1.2-9; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.2-6

; P.L. 1994, ch. 50, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 1.

12-1.2-7.
Powers and duties of director.

The director shall have general supervision over the administration of and shall enforce the provisions of this chapter. He or she shall recommend to the commission any rules and regulations that he or she may deem necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter and shall be responsible for the administration of the policies established by the commission.

The director shall be responsible for preparing an annual operating budget and submitting it to the dean of the College of Pharmacy at the University of Rhode Island, who will in turn submit it to the commission.

The director shall collect, develop, and maintain statistical information, records, and reports as the executive secretary or as the commission may determine relevant to its functions and transmit quarterly to the executive secretary or the commission a report of the operations of the state crime laboratory for the preceding quarter.

The director shall exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper in carrying out his or her responsibilities that may be directed by the executive secretary or the commission.

The director shall timely provide records, reports or other information pertaining to the operation of the crime laboratory whenever requested by the executive secretary or the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 206, § 2: G.L. § 12-1.2-9; P.L. 1981, ch. 300, § 1: G.L. §

12-1.2-7

; P.L. 1994, ch. 50, § 2.

12-1.2-8 — 12-1.2-14.
[Transferred.]